Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 8. Final Report, Accounting, Distribution and Discharge

§ 2-7-801.
Declaration of policy; clerk to maintain calendar; administration to be completed within one year; exception.

It is the policy of the state of Wyoming that the administration of estates of decedents be completed as rapidly as possible consistent with due protection of the interests of creditors, taxing authorities and distributees. To effectuate this policy, this code shall be so construed.

The clerk shall maintain a calendar as to each estate opened and shall bring to the attention of the court for appropriate action by the court on its own motion, any failure of any personal representative to meet any time deadlines provided by this code.

The administration of each estate of a decedent shall be completed within one (1) year from the date of appointment of the personal representative unless good cause is demonstrated to the court by a verified report filed by the personal representative, and a court order approving continuance is entered. Failure to comply with this provision may be dealt with by the court by citation for contempt, order of removal and replacement of the personal representative, or any other remedy the court deems appropriate to bring about prompt closing of the estate.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this code.” —

The term “this code” seems to mean the Wyoming Probate Code. See §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

Quoted in

Accelerated Receivable Solutions v. Hauf, 2015 WY 71,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(May 15, 2015).

§ 2-7-802.
Expenses of administration; standard; how paid.

The personal representative is authorized to incur and pay at any time, subject to approval upon hearing his final report and accounting, all reasonable and necessary expenses in the care, management and settlement of the estate. The personal representative’s authorization shall be exercised with the judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing which men of prudence, discretion and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs. Subject to the foregoing standard, the expenses may include but are not limited to services relating to:

Bank accounts and safekeeping facilities;

Appraisals;

Surveys;

Title and lien searches and certifications as to real or personal property;

Sales of real property and personal property, including broker’s commissions, premiums for title insurance, services in connection with abstracts of title and auctioneer’s fees;

Maintenance, repair, care and protection of estate assets, including such expenses as are normally incident to crops and livestock;

Property insurance of all types and liability insurance;

Events incident to distribution of estate assets, such as stock transfer fees and other normal expenses incident to transfer of title;

Preparation of all necessary tax returns and reports, and audit proceedings in connection therewith, relating to the decedent and the estate and the distribution of the estate;

Publications and mailings;

Location and identification of heirs and beneficiaries; and

Expenses, fees and costs of ancillary administration in a state other than Wyoming.

Except as otherwise directed by the decedent’s will, the expenses shall be paid first out of income of the estate received by the personal representative, then from the residue of the estate.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Land sale contract payments were not “estate income,”

where the annually received amounts, including interest, belonged to the defined legacy and were not estate receipts constituting income. In re Estate of Newell, 765 P.2d 1353,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 2-7-803.
Fees of personal representative; schedule.

If the court determines that by reason of unusual circumstances the fee computed hereafter is not equitable after considering the time and effort reasonably expended and the responsibility with which the personal representative was charged, the court may allow such additional fee as the court determines proper. The court shall allow the personal representative fees for ordinary services rendered to the estate unless the personal representative files a written waiver as to a part or all thereof. The fees shall be computed on the basis of the amount of the decedent’s probate estate accounted for as follows:

For the first one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) of the basis, ten percent (10%);

For all sums over one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) but not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) of the basis, five percent (5%);

For all sums over five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) but not exceeding twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) of the basis, three percent (3%);

For all sums over twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) of the basis, two percent (2%).

In addition, further fees as are just and reasonable may be allowed by the court to the personal representative for extraordinary expenses or services actually incurred or rendered by the personal representative and necessary to the proper administration and distribution of the estate. Extraordinary services shall include but not be limited to services rendered by the personal representative relative to any tax matters and services rendered by the personal representative in connection with any litigation to which the decedent or the estate is a party.

The amount of the decedent’s probate estate accounted for shall:

Include items with which the personal representative is chargeable at their inventory value;

Deduct any loss or add any increase shown by any reappraisement or actual sale occurring during administration;

Add all accretions to the estate which have come into the possession of the personal representative such as interest, dividends and profits on sales, not including money borrowed or refunds of amounts paid by the personal representative;

Deduct the value of property lost or destroyed without fault of the personal representative; and

Include accretions in net income, and not the gross income, of any business operated or conducted during administration of the estate.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1987, ch. 120, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of probate court to depart from statutory schedule fixing amount of executor's commissions and attorneys' fees, 40 ALR4th 1189.

§ 2-7-804.
Fees of attorney for estate; schedule.

If the court determines that by reason of unusual circumstances the fee computed hereafter is not equitable after considering the time and effort reasonably expended and the responsibility with which the personal representative was charged, the court may allow such additional fee as the court determines proper. The court shall allow the attorney for the estate fees for ordinary services rendered to the estate unless the attorney files a written waiver as to a part or all thereof. The fees shall be computed on the basis of the amount of the decedent’s probate estate accounted for as follows:

For the first one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) of the basis, ten percent (10%);

For the amount over one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) and not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) of the basis, five percent (5%);

For the amount over five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and not exceeding twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) of the basis, three percent (3%);

For all sums over twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) of the basis, two percent (2%).

In addition, further fees as are just and reasonable may be allowed by the court to the attorney for the estate for extraordinary expenses or services actually incurred or rendered by the attorney and necessary to the proper administration and distribution of the estate. Extraordinary services shall include but not be limited to services rendered by the attorney relative to any tax matters and services rendered by the attorney in connection with any litigation to which the decedent or the estate is a party.

The amount of the decedent’s probate estate accounted for shall be determined pursuant to W.S. 2-7-803(c).

Nothing herein shall prevent the personal representative and the attorney from negotiating lower fees.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1987, ch. 120, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of probate court to depart from statutory schedule fixing amount of executor's commissions and attorneys' fees, 40 ALR4th 1189.

§ 2-7-805.
Allowance and payment of personal representative's fees and attorney fees; limitations.

No fees shall be paid to the personal representative or the attorney for the estate except upon order of the court. At any time during the administration of the estate the personal representative or the attorney for the estate or both may submit a written, verified application to the court for an order allowing partial or total fees and expenses for ordinary services, or partial or total fees and expenses for extraordinary services, or both. Any application for expenses shall be supported by a written itemization of the expenses. Any application for fees for extraordinary services shall be supported by a written itemization showing the kind, nature, extent and time spent in connection with the services. If satisfied that the fees and expenses applied for or as limited by the court may be allowed and paid without detriment to any party interested in the estate or to the administration and conclusion of the estate, the court may enter an order allowing fees and expenses and authorizing payment from the estate. Any fees and expenses allowed by any order entered ex parte are subject to timely objection upon hearing of the final report and accounting.

Only one (1) total fee for ordinary services of a domiciliary personal representative, computed as provided in W.S.

2-7-802

, shall be allowed for any estate. Where more than one (1) person serves as a domiciliary personal representative either as co-fiduciaries or as a successor domiciliary personal representative, the court shall apportion the total fee among the parties in accordance with their agreement with each other, or absent any agreement as the court deems fair and just. The same rule shall prevail as to attorneys’ fees for ordinary services in domiciliary administration, computed in accordance with W.S.

2-7-803

, where more than one (1) attorney renders ordinary services to the domiciliary estate.

Where one (1) person, or a partner or employee of the same professional corporation as that person, serves both as personal representative and as attorney for the estate, no fee shall be allowed as to the estate for ordinary services of a personal representative.

No contingent fee shall be allowed against an estate or paid by an estate for legal services rendered to or for or on behalf of an estate, except in a proceeding for recovery for wrongful death under W.S.

1-38-101

and

1-38-102

, unless before commencement of the services a written contract is entered into by the personal representative and the attorney with respect thereto and the contract is submitted to the court upon written, verified application of the personal representative and is approved by the court. No contract shall be approved if it violates any statute or rule of court. No contract shall be approved unless it appears to the court, upon due consideration of the size of the estate and the nature and extent of the legal services to be rendered, that adequate compensation of the attorney cannot be assured by allowance of fees for extraordinary services pursuant to W.S.

2-7-803

.

The provisions of W.S.

2-7-801

through

2-7-804

apply to personal representatives and attorneys serving in ancillary administration in Wyoming, except as the probate court in which the ancillary administration is pending may otherwise determine for good cause shown.

Any contract between the personal representative or the attorney for the estate and any party interested in the estate in contravention of W.S.

2-7-802

through

2-7-804

is void.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (d), substituted “W.S.

1-38-101

and

1-38-102

” for “W.S.

2-14-201

and 2-14-202”; and in (e) substituted “2-7-804” for “2-7-804(d).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 2-7-806.
Verified interim report and accounting.

The personal representative may at any time file a verified interim report and accounting with the court showing the condition of the estate, its debts and property, the amount of money received and the disposition made of any assets of the estate.

If the final report and accounting is not filed by the personal representative within one (1) year from the date of his appointment, then a verified interim report and accounting shall be filed at the end of one (1) year and annually thereafter until the final report and accounting is filed.

On application of any creditor or distributee or upon its own motion, the court may order an interim report and accounting at any time embracing all matters directed by the court. The court may order reports and accountings from time to time as it determines to be in the best interests of the estate.

All interim reports and accountings shall be subject to the provisions of W.S. 2-7-807(c).

No interim report and accounting is binding upon any creditor or distributee unless it has been set down for hearing by the court and notice thereof given to the creditors and distributees by certified mail not less than twenty (20) days before the date of hearing.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cited

in

Hibsman v. Mullen (In re Estate of Hibsman), 2012 WY 139,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Oct 31, 2012).

§ 2-7-807.
Distribution before final settlement; notice; hearing; costs.

Any time after thirty (30) days from expiration of time for filing claims the personal representative or any distributee may file a petition with the court for partial or complete distribution of any share of the estate.

Notice of the petition and the time set by the court for hearing shall be given to the personal representative and to all persons entitled to notice as provided in W.S.

2-7-205

. At the hearing any other distributee may resist the petition or make a similar petition for himself.

If it appears to the court there is property ready for distribution held by the personal representative over and above the amount necessary to pay the costs of administration and all just claims and taxes of the estate, the court shall direct the personal representative to distribute to each distributee his proportion of the property ready for distribution. The court may require each distributee to give bond to secure payment of his proportion of the debts and taxes of the estate.

All costs, expenses and fees incurred in this proceeding shall be paid by the estate unless the court determines the proceeding was instituted capriciously and without merit, whereupon the court shall order all costs, expenses and fees be paid into the estate by the party instituting the same.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-808.
Order of abatement.

Except as provided in the will, shares of the distributees shall abate for the payment of debts and charges, federal and state taxes, legacies and the share of the surviving spouse who elects to take against the will without any preference or priority as between real and personal property, in the following order:

Property not disposed of by the will;

Property devised to the residuary devisee, except property devised to a surviving spouse who takes under the will;

Property disposed of by the will but not specifically devised and not devised to the residuary devisee, except property devised to a surviving spouse who takes under the will;

Property specifically devised, except property devised to a surviving spouse who takes under the will;

Property devised to a surviving spouse who takes under the will.

If the provisions of the will, the testamentary plan or the express or implied purpose of the devise would be defeated by the order of abatement stated in subsection (a), the shares of distributees shall abate in the manner necessary to give effect to the intention of the testator.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Newell, 765 P.2d 1353,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “STATUTES — Retroactive Application of the 1980 Wyoming Probate Code. Douglas v. Newell, 719 P.2d 971,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 555

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 553 (1989).

§ 2-7-809.
Contribution among legatees.

When property specifically given by will has been sold for the payment of debts, taxes or expenses of administration, all of the distributees shall contribute according to their respective interests, subject to W.S.

2-7-808

, to the distributee whose devise or legacy has been sold. When distribution is made, the court shall settle the amount of the several liabilities, decree the amount each person shall contribute and reserve that amount from their distributive shares for the purpose of paying the contribution.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-810.
Federal capital gains tax; minimum preference tax; apportionment.

Unless otherwise provided by will, when as a consequence of sale of property by the personal representative a federal capital gains tax or federal minimum preference tax is owed by the estate, the tax shall be apportioned as follows:

That portion of the tax attributable to the percentage of net sale proceeds used to pay debts and costs of administration shall be charged and allocated in accordance with W.S.

2-7-808

;

That portion of the tax attributable to the percentage of net sale proceeds used to pay federal estate tax shall be charged and allocated and collected in accordance with W.S.

2-10-101

through

2-10-110

;

The remaining portion of the tax shall be allocated to the distributee who would have received the property had it not been sold;

The distributee of the property had it not been sold shall be credited for distribution before the allocation of other debts, costs and taxes, with the net proceeds after capital gains and preference taxes plus the contributions required from other parties.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 2-7-811.
Final report and accounting and petition for distribution; contents; notice and hearing thereon.

When the estate is ready to be closed, the personal representative shall file with the clerk of court, under oath, his final report and accounting and petition for distribution.

The final report and accounting and petition for distribution shall set forth the following:

An accurate description of all the real estate of which the decedent died seized, stating the nature and extent of his interest therein, which has not been sold and conveyed by the personal representative;

Whether the deceased died testate or intestate;

The name and place of residence of the surviving spouse, or that none survived the deceased;

In intestate estates, the name and place of residence of each of the heirs and their relationship to the deceased;

In testate estates, the name and place of residence of each of the devisees and their relationship to the deceased;

Whether any legacy or devise remains in charge on the real estate, and the nature and amount thereof;

Whether any distributee is under any legal disability;

The name of the conservator or trustee for any distributee and the court from which his letters were issued;

An accounting of all the monies and personal property coming into the hands of the personal representative unless such accounting is waived by all interested parties;

A statement as to whether or not all statutory requirements pertaining to taxes, including the requirements of W.S. 2-7-812(a), have been complied with;

The personal representative’s proposed distribution of the estate.

The final report and accounting and petition for distribution shall be set down for hearing before the court. A copy thereof together with a notice of hearing shall be served as provided in W.S.

2-7-204

and

2-7-205

.

At or prior to the time fixed in the notice of hearing, any interested party who wishes to object shall file his objections in writing, in duplicate, with the clerk.

Upon the hearing, any matter appearing in the final report and accounting and petition for distribution and any matter improperly omitted therefrom may be called in question by written objection timely filed except only such matters as to which there has previously been a final adjudication. The personal representative shall have the burden of proof as to any issue of fact or law raised at the hearing. Upon conclusion of the hearing the court shall make and enter such order as the facts and the law require.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1981, ch. 151, § 2; 1989, ch. 115, § 1.

§ 2-7-812.
Payment of all taxes prerequisite; filing of documents.

Before a final decree of distribution is entered the court shall be satisfied by presentation of receipts, cancelled checks, certificates, closing letters and other proof that all federal, state, county and municipal taxes legally levied upon the property of the estate or due on account of the estate or death of the decedent have been fully paid. The court shall not discharge any personal representative nor release his bond nor issue a decree of final distribution of the estate until:

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 125, § 2.

All inheritance and estate taxes and interest have been paid; or

The court finds that no inheritance tax or estate tax is chargeable against the estate.

All documents presented to the court shall be filed with the clerk to be preserved as a permanent part of the court file relating to the estate.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1989, ch. 115, § 1; 2017 ch. 125, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 125, §
1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(iii), deleted “and excuses the filing of a receipt” at the end of the sentence.

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 125, §
2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (a)(i), which read: “A receipt from the inheritance tax commissioner is filed showing no inheritance and estate tax due.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 2-7-813.
Final decree of distribution.

Upon approval by the court of the final report and accounting and petition for distribution with any changes, corrections, amendments or supplements as may be required, the court shall enter a final decree of distribution. In the decree the court shall name the persons and the proportions or parts of the estate to which each is entitled. The personal representative shall proceed forthwith to make the distributions. The distributees may demand, sue for and recover their respective shares from the personal representative or any person having the same in possession.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Final order. —

Although the probate court never entered an order discharging the personal representative, the court's “Order Approving Final Report and Accounting, and Decree of Distribution” was a final appealable order as a matter of law, and was therefore not interlocutory in nature. There was no appeal from the decree, and it was final unless it was void. Jubie v. Dahlke (In re Estate of Dahlke), 2014 WY 29, 319 P.3d 116,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2014).

Court’s authority. —

Court had authority and a duty to enter a decree of distribution, although it might have erred in doing so without a hearing or signed waivers; the court sitting in probate had authority to enter the order, and it was not void for that reason. Jubie v. Dahlke (In re Estate of Dahlke), 2014 WY 29, 319 P.3d 116,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004).

§ 2-7-814.
Discharge of personal representative.

When the estate has been fully administered the personal representative may petition the court for his final discharge. Upon showing proof of payment or receipt that he has paid all sums of money due from him and delivered under order of the court all property of the estate to the parties entitled, and upon showing that he has performed all the acts lawfully required of him, the court shall make a decree discharging him and his bondsman, if any, from all further liability.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Personal representative not discharged. —

Although the probate court never entered an order discharging the personal representative, the court's “Order Approving Final Report and Accounting, and Decree of Distribution” was a final appealable order as a matter of law, and was therefore not interlocutory in nature. There was no appeal from the decree, and it was final unless it was void. Jubie v. Dahlke (In re Estate of Dahlke), 2014 WY 29, 319 P.3d 116,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004).

§ 2-7-815.
Closing of estates.

The court, upon its own motion, or upon the application of any party, may enter an order closing any pending estate when it appears from the court files or otherwise that no known assets belonging to the estate remain for administration or distribution. Such order shall not be deemed to exonerate the personal representative or his surety unless the order specifically so provides.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 151, § 1.

Applied

in

Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004).